Hawaii statutes.
§468E-6 Board of speech pathology and
audiology. (a) There is hereby established within the department of
commerce and consumer affairs a state board of speech pathology and audiology
consisting of seven members.

(b) The membership of the board shall include
two speech pathologists, two audiologists, and three public members, one of
whom shall be licensed to practice medicine in the State and hold a certificate
of qualification from the American Board of Otorhinolaryngology. Appointees
shall be fully licensed speech pathologists or audiologists.

All members of the board shall be residents of
the State.

(c) Members shall
serve for a term of four years. Terms shall begin on the first day of the
fiscal year and end on the last day of the fiscal year.

(d) Four members of the board shall constitute
a quorum for all purposes, but in no instance shall a meeting of the two speech
pathologist members and two audiologist members alone be considered a quorum.
[L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L
1986, c 130, §5; am L 1987, c 283, §38; am L 1992, c 202, §170; am L 2016, c 8,
§3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next